Utah statutes.
16-6a-1012.   Bylaw changing quorum or voting requirement for directors.

(1)  Bylaws that fix a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may be amended:

(a)  if adopted by the members, only by the members; or

(b)  if adopted by the board of directors, by:

(i)  the members; or

(ii)  the board of directors.

(2)  Bylaws adopted or amended by the members that fix a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that the bylaws may be amended only by a specified vote of:

(a)  the members; or

(b)  the board of directors.

(3)  Action by the board of directors under Subsection (1)(b) to adopt or amend bylaws that change the quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors shall meet the greater of the quorum and voting requirement for taking the action:

(a)  then in effect; or

(b)  proposed to be adopted.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

